Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-517
Bonds; how sold.

The bonds may be sold by the contracting public body in such manner and for such price as the contracting public body determines, at a discount, at par, or at a premium, at private negotiated sale or at public sale after notice published prior to such sale in a legal newspaper having general circulation in the municipality, in such other medium of publication as the contracting public body deems appropriate, or may be exchanged by the contracting public body for other bonds issued by it under the Nebraska Redevelopment Act. Bonds which are issued under this section may be sold by the contracting public body to the federal government at private sale at a discount, at par, or at a premium and, if less than all of the authorized principal amount of such bonds is sold by the contracting public body to the federal government, the balance or any portion of the balance may be sold by the contracting public body at private sale at a discount, at par, or at a premium.

Laws 1995, LB 830, § 17.